en: HVAC control functions: A/C control; Air recirculation; Airflow mode control; Auto climate mode; Auxiliary/parking heater control; Dual-zone control; Econ mode; Fan speed control; Fresh air intake; Front defrost/defog; Heated mirrors; Heated steering wheel; Heated windshield; Max A/C mode; Rear HVAC control; Rear window defrost; Seat heater control; Sync mode; Temperature control; Other
hu: HVAC vezérlő funkciók: Légkondicionáló vezérlés; Belső levegőkeringtetés; Légáramlás-szabályozás; Automatikus klíma mód; Kiegészítő/állóhelyzeti fűtés szabályozása; Kétzónás szabályozás; Gazdaságos mód; Ventilátorsebesség-szabályozás; Frisslevegő-beömlő; Első szélvédő jég- és páramentesítés; Fűthető tükrök; Fűthető kormánykerék; Fűthető szélvédő; Max A/C mód; Hátsó klímaszabályozás; Hátsó ablakfűtés; Ülésfűtés-szabályozás; Szinkron mód; Hőmérséklet-szabályozás; Egyéb
zh-CN: 暖通空调控制功能: 空调控制; 空气内循环; 气流模式控制; 自动恒温模式; 辅助/驻车加热器控制; 双区控制; 节能模式; 风扇转速控制; 吸入新鲜空气; 前除霜/除雾; 后视镜加热; 方向盘加热; 挡风玻璃加热; 最强制冷模式; 后排暖通空调控制; 后窗除霜; 座椅加热控制; 同步模式; 温度控制; 其他
ja: HVAC制御機能: A/C コントロール; 内気循環; 吹き出し口モードコントロール; オートエアコンモード; 補助/パーキングヒーターコントロール; デュアルゾーンコントロール; エコモード; 風量コントロール; 外気導入; フロントデフロスター/デフォッガー; ヒーテッドミラー; ステアリングヒーター; フロントガラスヒーター; Max A/C モード; リアHVACコントロール; リアウィンドウデフォッガー; シートヒーターコントロール; シンクモード; 温度コントロール; その他
de: Steuerungsfunktionen der Klimaanlage: Klimaanlagensteuerung; Umluft; Luftstromsteuerung; Klimaautomatik; Standheizungssteuerung; Zwei-Zonen-Steuerung; Econ-Modus; Gebläsesteuerung; Frischluftzufuhr; Frontscheibenheizung/-enteisung; Beheizbare Außenspiegel; Lenkradheizung; Frontscheibenheizung; Max-A/C-Modus; Fond-Klimasteuerung; Heckscheibenheizung; Sitzheizungssteuerung; Sync-Modus; Temperaturregelung; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Funções de controle do HVAC: Controle de ar-condicionado; Recirculação de ar; Controle de modo de fluxo de ar; Modo de climatização automática; Controle de aquecimento auxiliar/estacionamento; Controle dual zone; Modo Econ; Controle de velocidade do ventilador; Entrada de ar fresco; Desembaçador dianteiro; Espelhos aquecidos; Volante aquecido; Para-brisa aquecido; Modo A/C máximo; Controle de HVAC traseiro; Desembaçador traseiro; Controle de aquecimento do banco; Modo de sincronização; Controle de temperatura; Outro
tr: HVAC kontrol işlevleri: Klima kontrolü; Hava sirkülasyonu; Hava akışı modu kontrolü; Otomatik klima modu; Yardımcı/park ısıtıcı kontrolü; Çift bölgeli kontrol; Eko mod; Fan hızı kontrolü; Temiz hava girişi; Ön cam buz/buğu çözücü; Isıtmalı aynalar; Isıtmalı direksiyon; Isıtmalı ön cam; Maks. klima modu; Arka HVAC kontrolü; Arka cam buz çözücü; Koltuk ısıtıcı kontrolü; Senkronizasyon modu; Sıcaklık kontrolü; Diğer
sk-SK: Ovládacie funkcie klimatizácie: Ovládanie klimatizácie; Recirkulácia vzduchu; Ovládanie režimu prúdenia vzduchu; Režim automatickej klimatizácie; Ovládanie nezávislého kúrenia; Dvojzónové ovládanie; Úsporný režim; Ovládanie rýchlosti ventilátora; Prívod čerstvého vzduchu; Rozmrazovanie/odmlžovanie predného skla; Vyhrievané zrkadlá; Vyhrievaný volant; Vyhrievané čelné sklo; Režim max. klimatizácie; Ovládanie zadnej klimatizácie; Rozmrazovanie zadného okna; Ovládanie vyhrievania sedadiel; Režim synchronizácie; Regulácia teploty; Iné
es: Funciones de control de climatización: Control de A/A; Recirculación de aire; Control del modo de flujo de aire; Modo de clima automático; Control de calefacción auxiliar/de estacionamiento; Control de zona dual; Modo económico; Control de velocidad del ventilador; Entrada de aire fresco; Desempañador/desescarchador delantero; Espejos con calefacción; Volante con calefacción; Parabrisas con calefacción; Modo de A/A máximo; Control trasero de HVAC; Desempañador de la ventana trasera; Control de calefacción de asientos; Modo de sincronización; Control de temperatura; Otra
nl: HVAC-regelingsfuncties: Airco-bediening; Luchtrecirculatie; Luchtstroommodus-bediening; Automatische klimaatmodus; Standkachel-bediening; Dual-zone-bediening; Econ-modus; Ventilatorsnelheid-bediening; Toevoer verse lucht; Ontdooien/ontwasemen voor; Verwarmde spiegels; Verwarmd stuurwiel; Verwarmde voorruit; Max. airco-modus; HVAC-bediening achter; Achterruitverwarming; Stoelverwarming-bediening; Sync-modus; Temperatuurbediening; Overig
bg-BG: Функции за управление на ОВК система: Управление на климатика; Рециркулация на въздуха; Управление на режима на въздушния поток; Автоматичен климатичен режим; Управление на печка/допълнителен отоплител; Двузоново управление; Икономичен режим; Управление на скоростта на вентилатора; Приток на свеж въздух; Размразяване/обдухване на предното стъкло; Подгряване на огледалата; Подгряване на волана; Подгряване на предното стъкло; Режим максимално охлаждане; Управление на заден HVAC; Размразяване на задното стъкло; Управление на подгряването на седалките; Режим на синхронизация; Управление на температурата; Друго
vi: Các chức năng điều khiển HVAC: Điều khiển điều hòa; Lấy gió trong; Điều khiển chế độ hướng gió; Chế độ điều hòa tự động; Điều khiển sưởi phụ/sưởi khi đỗ xe; Điều khiển hai vùng độc lập; Chế độ tiết kiệm (Econ); Điều khiển tốc độ quạt; Lấy gió ngoài; Sấy/khử sương kính trước; Sấy gương; Sưởi vô lăng; Sấy kính chắn gió; Chế độ điều hòa tối đa; Điều khiển HVAC phía sau; Sấy kính sau; Điều khiển sưởi ghế; Chế độ đồng bộ; Điều khiển nhiệt độ; Khác
hr-HR: Funkcije upravljanja HVAC sustavom: Kontrola klima-uređaja; Recirkulacija zraka; Kontrola načina protoka zraka; Automatski način rada klime; Kontrola pomoćnog/parkirnog grijača; Dvozonska kontrola; Ekonomični način rada; Kontrola brzine ventilatora; Dovod svježeg zraka; Odmrzavanje/odmagljivanje prednjeg stakla; Grijani retrovizori; Grijani upravljač; Grijano vjetrobransko staklo; Maksimalno hlađenje (Max A/C); Stražnja kontrola HVAC-a; Odmrzavanje stražnjeg stakla; Kontrola grijača sjedala; Način rada sinkronizacije (Sync); Kontrola temperature; Ostalo
pl: Funkcje sterowania klimatyzacją: Sterowanie klimatyzacją; Obieg zamknięty; Sterowanie kierunkiem nawiewu; Klimatyzacja automatyczna; Sterowanie ogrzewaniem postojowym; Sterowanie dwustrefowe; Tryb Eco; Sterowanie prędkością wentylatora; Dopływ świeżego powietrza; Odmrażanie/odparowanie przedniej szyby; Podgrzewane lusterka; Podgrzewana kierownica; Podgrzewana przednia szyba; Tryb Max A/C; Sterowanie klimatyzacją z tyłu; Odmrażanie tylnej szyby; Sterowanie podgrzewaniem siedzeń; Tryb synchronizacji; Sterowanie temperaturą; Inne
lt-LT: HVAC valdymo funkcijos: A/C (kondicionieriaus) valdymas; Oro recirkuliacija; Oro srauto režimo valdymas; Automatinis klimato režimas; Papildomo / autonominio šildytuvo valdymas; Dviejų zonų valdymas; Ekonominis režimas; Ventiliatoriaus greičio valdymas; Šviežio oro įleidimas; Priekinio lango atitirpinimas / nerasojimas; Šildomi veidrodėliai; Šildomas vairas; Šildomas priekinis stiklas; „Max A/C“ režimas; Galinės oro kondicionavimo sistemos valdymas; Galinio lango atitirpinimas; Sėdynių šildymo valdymas; Sinchronizavimo režimas; Temperatūros valdymas; Kita
zh-TW: 暖通空調控制功能: 空調控制; 空氣循環; 氣流模式控制; 自動氣候模式; 輔助/駐車加熱器控制; 雙區控制; 節能模式; 風扇速度控制; 進氣; 前擋除霜/除霧; 加熱後視鏡; 加熱方向盤; 加熱擋風玻璃; 強效空調模式; 後座 HVAC 控制; 後窗除霜; 座椅加熱器控制; 同步模式; 溫度控制; 其他
sl-SI: Nadzorne funkcije HVAC (gretje, prezračevanje, hlajenje): Nadzor klime; Recirkulacija zraka; Nadzor pretoka zraka; Samodejna klima; Nadzor pomožnega/parkirnega grelca; Dvopodročni nadzor; Varčni način; Nadzor hitrosti ventilatorja; Dovod svežega zraka; Odmrzovanje/odrosevanje spredaj; Ogrevana ogledala; Ogrevan volan; Ogrevano vetrobransko steklo; Način Max A/C; Nadzor klime zadaj; Odmrzovanje zadnjega stekla; Nadzor gretja sedežev; Način sinhronizacije; Nadzor temperature; Drugo
nb: HVAC-kontrollfunksjoner: A/C-kontroll; Luftsirkulasjon; Luftstrømkontroll; Autoklima-modus; Kontroll for tilleggs-/parkeringsvarmer; Tosonekontroll; Eco-modus; Viftehastighetskontroll; Friskluftinntak; Avising/duggfjerning foran; Oppvarmede speil; Oppvarmet ratt; Oppvarmet frontrute; Maks A/C-modus; Klimakontroll bak; Bakruteavising; Setevarmekontroll; Synkroniseringsmodus; Temperaturkontroll; Annet
th: ฟังก์ชันควบคุมระบบปรับอากาศ: ควบคุมแอร์; ระบบหมุนเวียนอากาศ; ควบคุมทิศทางลม; โหมดควบคุมอุณหภูมิอัตโนมัติ; ควบคุมระบบทำความร้อนเสริม/ขณะจอด; ควบคุมแบบดูอัลโซน; โหมดประหยัดพลังงาน; ควบคุมความเร็วพัดลม; รับอากาศภายนอก; ไล่ฝ้ากระจกหน้า; ระบบไล่ฝ้ากระจกข้าง; พวงมาลัยปรับอุ่นได้; กระจกหน้าปรับอุ่นได้; โหมดแอร์เย็นสุด; ควบคุมแอร์หลัง; ไล่ฝ้ากระจกหลัง; ควบคุมระบบอุ่นเบาะ; โหมดซิงก์; ควบคุมอุณหภูมิ; อื่นๆ
el: Λειτουργίες ελέγχου HVAC: Έλεγχος A/C; Ανακύκλωση αέρα; Έλεγχος λειτουργίας ροής αέρα; Αυτόματη λειτουργία κλιματισμού; Έλεγχος βοηθητικού καλοριφέρ/στάθμευσης; Έλεγχος διπλής ζώνης; Λειτουργία Econ; Έλεγχος ταχύτητας ανεμιστήρα; Εισαγωγή φρέσκου αέρα; Μπροστινή απόψυξη/ξεθάμπωμα; Θερμαινόμενοι καθρέπτες; Θερμαινόμενο τιμόνι; Θερμαινόμενο παρμπρίζ; Λειτουργία Max A/C; Πίσω έλεγχος HVAC; Απόψυξη πίσω παραθύρου; Έλεγχος θέρμανσης καθισμάτων; Λειτουργία Sync; Έλεγχος θερμοκρασίας; Άλλο
sv: Funktioner för HVAC-styrning: A/C-styrning; Luftcirkulation; Luftflödesstyrning; Autoklimatläge; Kontroll för extravärmare/parkeringsvärmare; Dubbelzonsstyrning; Eko-läge; Fläkthastighetskontroll; Friskluftsintag; Avfrostning/imskydd fram; Uppvärmda backspeglar; Uppvärmd ratt; Uppvärmd vindruta; Max A/C-läge; Bakre HVAC-styrning; Avfrostning bakruta; Kontroll för sätesvärme; Synk-läge; Temperaturkontroll; Övrigt
cs: Funkce řízení systémů vytápění, ventilace a klimatizace: Ovládání klimatizace; Recirkulace vzduchu; Ovládání režimu proudění vzduchu; Automatická klimatizace; Ovládání nezávislého/parkovacího topení; Dvouzónové ovládání; Ekonomický režim; Ovládání rychlosti ventilátoru; Přívod čerstvého vzduchu; Odmrazování/odmlžování čelního skla; Vyhřívaná zrcátka; Vyhřívaný volant; Vyhřívané čelní sklo; Režim maximální klimatizace; Zadní ovládání klimatizace; Odmrazování zadního skla; Ovládání vyhřívání sedadel; Režim synchronizace; Ovládání teploty; Ostatní
it: Funzioni di controllo HVAC: Controllo aria condizionata; Ricircolo dell'aria; Controllo modalità flusso d'aria; Modalità climatizzazione automatica; Controllo riscaldamento ausiliario/da parcheggio; Controllo bizona; Modalità economica; Controllo velocità ventola; Ingresso aria esterna; Sbrinamento/disappannamento anteriore; Specchietti riscaldati; Volante riscaldato; Parabrezza riscaldato; Modalità aria condizionata max; Controllo HVAC posteriore; Sbrinatore lunotto; Controllo riscaldamento sedili; Modalità Sync; Controllo temperatura; Altro
ru: Функции управления HVAC: Управление кондиционером; Рециркуляция воздуха; Управление направлением обдува; Автоматический климат-контроль; Управление автономным/парковочным отопителем; Двухзонный климат-контроль; Экономичный режим (Econ); Управление скоростью вентилятора; Приток свежего воздуха; Обогрев/обдув лобового стекла; Обогрев зеркал; Обогрев руля; Обогрев лобового стекла; Режим максимального охлаждения (Max A/C); Управление климатом сзади; Обогрев заднего стекла; Управление подогревом сидений; Режим синхронизации зон (Sync); Управление температурой; Другое
da: HVAC-styringsfunktioner: A/C-styring; Luftrecirkulation; Styring af luftstrøm; Automatisk klimastyring; Styring af tilskuds-/parkeringsvarmer; Styring af to zoner; Øko-tilstand; Styring af blæserhastighed; Friskluftindtag; Afrimning/afdugning af forrude; Opvarmede spejle; Opvarmet rat; Opvarmet forrude; Maks. A/C-tilstand; HVAC-styring bagtil; Afrimning af bagrude; Styring af sædevarme; Synkroniseringstilstand; Temperaturstyring; Andet
fr: Fonctions de commande des systèmes CVC: Contrôle de la climatisation; Recirculation de l'air; Contrôle du mode de flux d'air; Mode climatisation automatique; Contrôle du chauffage auxiliaire/de stationnement; Contrôle bizone; Mode éco; Contrôle de la vitesse du ventilateur; Entrée d’air frais; Dégivrage/désembuage avant; Rétroviseurs chauffants; Volant chauffant; Pare-brise chauffant; Mode climatisation max; Contrôle de climatisation arrière; Dégivrage de lunette arrière; Contrôle des sièges chauffants; Mode synchronisation; Contrôle de la température; Autre
ko: HVAC 제어 기능: 에어컨 제어; 공기 순환; 송풍 모드 제어; 자동 공조 모드; 보조/무시동 히터 제어; 듀얼 존 제어; 에코 모드; 풍속 제어; 외부 공기 유입; 앞유리 성에/김서림 제거; 열선 미러; 열선 스티어링 휠; 열선 앞유리; 최대 에어컨 모드; 뒷좌석 HVAC 제어; 뒷유리 성에 제거; 열선 시트 제어; 동기화 모드; 온도 제어; 기타
fi: LVI-ohjaustoiminnot: Ilmastoinnin ohjaus; Ilmankierto; Ilmavirran tilan ohjaus; Automaattinen ilmastointitila; Lisä-/pysäköintilämmittimen ohjaus; Kaksivyöhykkeinen ohjaus; Econ-tila; Tuulettimen nopeuden ohjaus; Raitisilmanotto; Tuulilasin huurteenpoisto; Lämmitettävät peilit; Lämmitettävä ohjauspyörä; Lämmitettävä tuulilasi; Ilmastoinnin maksimiteho; Takaosan LVI-ohjaus; Takalasin huurteenpoisto; Istuimen lämmittimen ohjaus; Synkronointitila; Lämpötilan ohjaus; Muu
pt-PT: Funções de controlo de AVAC: Controlo do ar condicionado; Recirculação de ar; Controlo do modo de fluxo de ar; Modo de climatização automático; Controlo do aquecedor auxiliar/estacionamento; Controlo de zona dupla; Modo económico; Controlo da velocidade da ventoinha; Entrada de ar fresco; Descongelação/desembaciamento frontal; Espelhos aquecidos; Volante aquecido; Para-brisas aquecido; Modo de ar condicionado máximo; Controlo de AVAC traseiro; Descongelação do vidro traseiro; Controlo do aquecimento dos bancos; Modo de sincronização; Controlo da temperatura; Outro
ro-RO: Funcții de control HVAC: Control A/C; Recircularea aerului; Controlul direcției fluxului de aer; Mod climatizare automată; Control încălzire auxiliară/staționară; Control pe două zone; Mod Econ; Controlul vitezei ventilatorului; Priză de aer proaspăt; Dezghețare/dezaburire parbriz; Oglinzi încălzite; Volan încălzit; Parbriz încălzit; Mod A/C Max; Control HVAC spate; Dezaburire lunetă; Control încălzire scaune; Mod sincronizare; Controlul temperaturii; Altele